West Virginia, session 2026, HB5616.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER BENEFITS. §18A-4-1. Definitions. For the purpose of this article, salaries shall be defined as: (a) "Basic salaries" which shall mean the salaries paid to teachers with zero years of experience and in accordance with the classification of certification and of training of said teachers; and (b) "advanced salaries" which shall mean the basic salary plus an experience increment based on the allowable years of experience of the respective teachers in accordance with the schedule established herein for the applicable classification of certification and of training of said teachers."Classification of certification" means the class or type of certificate issued by the state superintendent under the statutory provisions of this chapter. "Classification of training" means the number of collegiate or graduate hours necessary to meet the requirements stipulated in the definitions set forth in the next paragraph in items (2) to (11), inclusive.The column heads of the state minimum salary schedule set forth in section two of this article are defined as follows:(1) "Years of experience" means the number of years the teacher has been employed in the teaching profession, including active work in educational positions other than the public schools, and service in the Armed Forces of the United States if the teacher was under contract to teach at the time of induction. For a registered professional nurse employed by a county board, "years of experience" means the number of years the nurse has been employed as a public school health nurse, including active work in a nursing position related to education, and service in the Armed Forces if the nurse was under contract with the county board at the time of induction. For the purpose of section two of this article, the experience of a teacher or a nurse shall be limited to that allowed under their training classification as found in the minimum salary schedule. For purposes of §18A-4-8 of this code, service personnel shall be granted years of service based upon his or her years employed by the county board.(2) "Fourth class" means all certificates previously identified as: (a) "Certificates secured by examination"; and (b) "other first grade certificates".(3) "Third class" means all certificates previously identified as: (a) "Standard normal certificates"; and (b) "third class temporary (sixty-four semester hours) certificates".(4) "Second class" means all certificates previously identified as "second class temporary certificates based upon the required ninety-six hours of college work".(5) "A.B." means a bachelor's degree, from an accredited institution of higher education, which has been issued to, or for which the requirements for such have been met by, a person who qualifies for or holds a professional certificate or its equivalent. A registered professional nurse with a bachelor's degree, who is licensed by the West Virginia board of examiners for registered professional nurses and employed by a county board, shall be within this classification for payment in accordance with sections two and two-a of this article.(6) "A.B. plus 15" means a bachelor's degree as defined above plus fifteen hours of graduate work, from an accredited institution of higher education certified to do graduate work, in an approved planned program at the graduate level which requirements have been met by a person who qualifies for or holds a professional certificate or its equivalent.(7) "M.A." means a master's degree, earned in an institution of higher education approved to do graduate work, which has been issued to, or the requirements for such have been met by, a person who qualifies for or holds a professional certificate or its equivalent.(8) "M.A. plus 15" means the above-defined master's degree plus fifteen hours of graduate work, earned in an institution of higher education approved to do graduate work, if the person is qualified for or holds a professional certificate or its equivalent.(9) "M.A. plus 30" means the above-defined master's degree plus thirty graduate hours, earned in an institution approved to do graduate work, if the person is qualified for or holds a professional certificate or its equivalent.(10) "Doctorate" means a doctor's degree, earned from a university qualified and approved to confer such a degree, which has been issued to or the requirements for such have been met by a person who qualifies for or holds a professional certificate or its equivalent.For purposes of advanced salary classification, graduate work completed after July 1, 1994, shall be related to the public school program, as prescribed by the state board.Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in subdivisions (6), (8) and (9) of this section relating to hours of graduate work at an institution certified to do such work, fifteen undergraduate credit hours from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, earned after the effective date of this section, may be utilized for advanced salary classification if such hours are in accordance with: (a) The teacher's current classification of certification and of training; (b) a designated instructional shortage area documented by the employing county superintendent; or (c) an identified teaching deficiency documented through the state approved county personnel evaluation system. Effective July 1, 1994, the following definition shall be applicable.(11) "M.A. plus 45" means the above-defined master's degree plus forty-five graduate hours, earned in an institution approved to do graduate work, if the person is qualified for or holds a professional certificate or its equivalent.